Oklahoma, session 2025, SB373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-162 of Title 70, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Research

and Education Protection Act of 2025”. The purpose of the act is to

protect research and educational system operations in this state

from malicious influence from foreign countries of concern.

B. As used in this act:

1. “Affiliate organization” means any entity under the control

of or established for the benefit of an organization required to

report pursuant to this section including a direct-support

organization;

2. “Agreement” means a written or spoken statement of mutual

interest in cultural exchange or academic or research collaboration;

3. “Allied countries” means:

Req. No. 835 Page 3

a. nations currently party to any bilateral mutual

defense treaties including the North Atlantic Treaty,

the Agreement between the United States and Australia

and New Zealand, the Philippine Treaty, the Southeast

Asia Treaty, the Japanese Treaty, the Republic of

Korea Treaty, or the Rio Treaty,

b. any nation currently designated as a Major Non-North

Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO) Ally by the United

States Department of State, or

c. the Republic of China;

4. “Contract” means any agreement for the acquisition by

purchase, lease, or barter of property or services for the direct

benefit or use of either of the parties;

5. “Country of concern” means the People’s Republic of China,

the Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the Democratic

People’s Republic of Korea, the State of Qatar, the Republic of

Cuba, the Venezuelan regime of Nicolas Maduro, the Syrian Arab

Republic, or any foreign terrorist organization designated by the

United States Secretary of State in accordance with the Immigration

and Naturalization Act, as amended, including any agent of or any

other entity under significant control of such foreign country of

concern or any other entity deemed by the Governor in consultation

with the Oklahoma Office of Homeland Security;



Req. No. 835 Page 4

6. “Direct-support organization” means an organization that is

organized and operated to receive, hold, invest, and administer

property and to make expenditures to or for the benefit of an

institution of higher education or for the benefit of a research and

development park or research and development authority affiliated

with an institution of higher education;

7. “Foreign government” means the government of any country,

nation, group of nations, or any province or political subdivision

of any country, nation, or group of nations other than the

government of the United States including any agent of such foreign

government;

8. “Foreign source” means:

a. a foreign government or an agency of a foreign

government,

b. a legal entity, governmental or otherwise, created

solely under the laws of a foreign state or states,

c. an individual who is not a citizen or a national of

the United States or a territory or protectorate of

the United States,

d. a partnership, association, corporation, organization,

or any other combination of persons organized under

the laws of or having its principal place of business

in a country of concern of subsidiary of such entity,



Req. No. 835 Page 5

e. an agent including a subsidiary or an affiliate of a

foreign legal entity acting on behalf of a foreign

source,

f. a political party or a member of a political party.

For the purposes of this subparagraph, the term

“political party” means an organization or combination

of individuals whose aim or purpose is, or who is

engaged in any activity devoted in whole or in part

to, the establishment, administration, control, or

acquisition of administration or control of a

government of a country of concern or a subdivision

thereof or the furtherance or influencing of the

political or public interest, policies, or relations

of a government of a country of concern or subdivision

thereof, or

g. a program operated for the benefit of a government or

political party of a country of concern including, but

not limited to, the Thousand Talents Program, any

program affiliated with United Front operations, or

any program affiliated with a country of concern’s

ministry of education;

9. “Gift” means any gift, grant, endowment, award, or donation

of money or property of any kind, or any combination thereof,

including a conditional or unconditional pledge of such gift,

Req. No. 835 Page 6

endo wment, award, or donation. For the purposes of this paragraph,

pledge means a promise, an agreement, or an expressed intention to

give a gift, and grant means a transfer of money for a specified

purpose including a conditional gift;

10. “Institution of higher education” means an institution of

higher education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher

Education or a private institution of higher learning located within

this state and accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of Title 70 of

the Oklahoma Statutes;

11. “Interest” in an entity means any direct or indirect

investment in or loan to an entity valued at five percent (5%) or

more of the entity’s net worth or any form of direct or indirect

control exerting similar or greater influence on the governance of

the entity;

12. “Partnership” means a faculty or student exchange program,

a study abroad program, a matriculation program, a recruiting

program, or a dual degree program; and

13. “Public school” means a public school district, public

charter school, or public statewide virtual charter school.

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-163 of Title 70, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Upon the effective date of this act, no institution of higher

education or public school shall accept any gift, research funding,

Req. No. 835 Page 7

or a ny other item, service, contract, partnership, or thing of value

from a foreign source or from a country of concern.

SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-164 of Title 70, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. 1. Any public school or institution of higher education

that has received directly or indirectly any gift with any value

from any foreign source from a country of concern after December 31,

2013, shall disclose such gifts in the following manner:

a. public schools shall disclose such gifts to the State

Board of Education and the State Department of

Education within sixty (60) days after the effective

date of this act, and

b. institutions of higher education shall disclose such

gifts to the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher

Education within sixty (60) days after the effective

date of this act.

2. Unless otherwise prohibited or deemed confidential under

state or federal law, disclosure required by this subsection shall

include the date the gift was received; the amount of the gift; the

purpose of the gift; the identification of the persons the gift was

explicitly intended to benefit; any applicable conditions,

requirements, restrictions, or terms made part of the gift; the name

and country of residence or domicile of the foreign source; the name

Req. No. 835 Page 8

and mailing address of the disclosing entity; and, as applicable,

the date of termination of the gift.

3. Information submitted pursuant to paragraph 1 of this

subsection shall be forwarded to the Office of Management and

Enterprise Services (OMES), which shall maintain a public web portal

to disclose information on past gifts from countries of concern.

4. Upon a request from the Governor, the President Pro Tempore

of the Senate, or the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the

State Auditor and Inspector shall inspect or audit a past gift or

gift agreement.

B. 1. Any public school or institution of higher education

that has been offered directly or indirectly any gift with any value

from a foreign source from a country of concern after the effective

date of this act shall disclose such gift in the following manner:

a. public schools shall disclose such gifts to the State

Board of Education and the State Department of

Education before accepting such gifts, and

b. institutions of higher education shall disclose such

gifts to the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher

Education before accepting such gifts.

2. Unless otherwise prohibited or deemed confidential under

state or federal law, disclosure required by this subsection shall

include the date the gift was offered; the amount of the gift; the

purpose of the gift; the identification of the persons the gift was

Req. No. 835 Page 9

expl icitly intended to benefit; any applicable conditions,

requirements, restrictions, or terms made part of the gift; the name

and country of residence or domicile of the foreign source; the name

and mailing address of the disclosing entity; and, as applicable,

the date of termination of the gift.

3. Information submitted pursuant to paragraph 1 of this

subsection shall be forwarded to OMES. Within thirty (30) days of

receiving the disclosure of an offered gift, OMES shall issue a

final decision to the public school or institution of higher

education on whether and under what conditions the public school or

institution of higher education may accept the gift. OMES shall:

a. develop disclosure forms, rules, and procedures for

deciding whether to allow a public school or

institution of higher education to accept gifts from

countries of concern, and

b. maintain a public web portal disclosing proposed gifts

from countries of concern with the final decision from

OMES on whether to allow the public school or

institution of higher education to accept the gift.

4. For the purposes of this section, a gift received by a

public school or institution of higher education from a foreign

source through an intermediary shall be considered an indirect gift

and shall be subject to the approval process provided for in this

subsection.

Req. No. 835 Page 10

5. Upon the request of the Governor, the President Pro Tempore

of the Senate, or the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the

State Auditor and Inspector shall inspect or audit a gift or gift

agreement.

SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-165 of Title 70, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. A public school or institution of higher education that has

entered directly or indirectly into any contract with any value from

any foreign source from a country of concern after December 31,

2013, shall disclose such contracts in the following manner:

1. Public schools shall disclose such contracts to the State

Board of Education and the State Department of Education within

sixty (60) days after the effective date of this act; and

2. Institutions of higher education shall disclose such

contracts to the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education within

sixty (60) days after the effective date of this act.

B. Unless otherwise prohibited or deemed confidential under

state or federal law, disclosure required by subsection A of this

section shall include the date of the contract; the amount of the

contract; the purpose of the contract; the identification of the

persons the contract was explicitly intended to benefit; any

applicable conditions, requirements, restrictions, or terms made

part of the contract; a copy of the contract; the name and country

Req. No. 835 Page 11

of r esidence or domicile of the foreign source; the name and mailing

address of the disclosing entity; and, as applicable, the date of

termination of the contract.

C. For the purposes of this section, a contract entered into

with a foreign source through an intermediary or affiliate

organization shall be considered an indirect contract to the public

school or institution of higher education and shall be subject to

the disclosure process provided for in this section.

D. Information submitted pursuant to subsection A of this

section shall be forwarded to the Office of Management and

Enterprise Services (OMES), which shall maintain a public web portal

to disclose information on past proposed and entered into contracts

with countries of concern.

E. Upon the request of the Governor, the President Pro Tempore

of the Senate, or the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the

State Auditor and Inspector shall inspect or audit a past contract.

F. Any public school or institution of higher education that

has been offered or has proposed directly or indirectly any contract

with any value from or with a foreign source from a country of

concern after the effective date of this act shall disclose such

proposed contract in the following manner:

1. Public schools shall disclose such contract to the State

Board of Education and the State Department of Education before

entering into such contract; and

Req. No. 835 Page 12

2. Institutions of higher education shall disclose such

contract to the State Regents.

G. Unless otherwise prohibited or deemed confidential under

state or federal law, disclosure required by subsection F of this

section shall include the date of the contract; the amount of the

contract; the purpose of the contract; the identification of the

persons the contract was explicitly intended to benefit; any

applicable conditions, requirements, restrictions, or terms made

part of the contract; a copy of the contract; the name and country

of residence or domicile of the foreign source; the name and mailing

address of the disclosing entity; and, as applicable, the date of

termination of the contract.

H. Information submitted pursuant to subsection F of this

section shall be forwarded to OMES. Within thirty (30) days of

receiving the disclosure of the offered or proposed contract, OMES

shall issue a final decision to the public school or institution of

higher education on whether and under what conditions the public

school or institution of higher education may enter into the

contract. OMES shall:

1. Develop disclosure forms, rules, and procedures for deciding

whether to allow a public school or an institution of higher

education to enter into a contract with a country of concern; and

2. Maintain a public web portal disclosing proposed or offered

contracts with countries of concern with the final decision from

Req. No. 835 Page 13

OMES on whether to allow the public school or institution of higher

education to enter into the contract.

I. For the purposes of this section, a contract proposed from a

foreign source through an intermediary or affiliate organization

shall be considered an indirect contract with the public school or

institution of higher education and shall be subject to the approval

process provided for in subsection H of this section.

J. Upon the request of the Governor, the President Pro Tempore

of the Senate, or the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the

State Auditor and Inspector shall inspect or audit a contract

entered into pursuant to this section.

SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-166 of Title 70, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. A public school or institution of higher education that

knowingly, willfully, or negligently fails to disclose the

information required by the Research and Education Protection Act of

2025 shall be subject to a civil penalty of one hundred and five

percent (105%) of the amount of the undisclosed gift or contract,

payable only from non-state funds. The recovered funds shall be

deposited into the General Revenue Fund. The State Board of

Education or the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may

administratively enforce the penalty provided for in this section as

an administrative penalty.

Req. No. 835 Page 14

B. In the absence of enforcement by the State Board of

Education or the State Regents, the Attorney General or the Office

of the State Treasurer may bring a civil action to enforce the

provisions of the Research and Education Protection Act of 2025. If

such action is successful, the Attorney General or the Office of the

State Treasurer shall be entitled to reasonable attorney fees and

costs.

C. An employee of a public school or an institution of higher

education who in good faith reports an undisclosed foreign gift or

contract to the Attorney General or the Office of the State

Treasurer shall be immune from employment discipline or civil

liability. The reporting employee shall be entitled to receive a

reward in the amount of twenty-five percent (25%) of any penalty

recovered by the State Board of Education, the State Regents, the

Attorney General, or the Office of the State Treasurer.

D. Information reported pursuant to Sections 2 and 3 of this

act shall not be deemed confidential except as provided for in the

Oklahoma Open Records Act.

E. The State Board of Education and the State Regents may adopt

promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.

SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-167 of Title 70, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 835 Page 15

A. A public school or institution of higher education shall not

participate in any cultural exchange agreement with a foreign source

from a country of concern, or any entity controlled by a country of

concern, which:

1. Constrains the freedom of contract of such public school or

institution of higher education;

2. Allows the curricula or values of a program in this state to

be directed, controlled, or influenced by a country of concern; or

3. Promotes an agenda detrimental to the safety or security of

this state, its residents, or the United States.

B. Prior to the execution of a cultural exchange agreement with

a foreign source from a country of concern, the substance of the

agreement shall be shared with:

1. Federal agencies concerned with protecting national security

or enforcing trade sanctions, embargoes, or other restrictions under

federal law. If any federal agency provides information suggesting

that such an agreement promotes an agenda detrimental to the safety

or security of this state, the United States, or its residents, the

public school or institution of higher education may not enter into

the agreement; and

2. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services (OMES). If

OMES provides information suggesting that such an agreement promotes

an agenda detrimental to the safety or security of this state, the



Req. No. 835 Page 16

Unit ed States, or its residents, the public school or institution of

higher education may not enter into the agreement.

C. By July 1, 2026, and by each July 1 thereafter, each public

school shall submit the information required by subsection B of this

section to the State Board of Education, and each institution of

higher education shall submit the information required by subsection

B of this section to the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher

Education.

D. By December 1, 2026, and each December 1 thereafter, the

State Regents and the State Board of Education shall each

electronically submit a report to the Governor, the President Pro

Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of

Representatives relating to partnerships and agreements of

institutions of higher education and public schools, respectively,

made with educational institutions or other institutions based in

countries of concern. The report shall include at a minimum the

following information for the previous fiscal year:

1. Data reflecting any grant program, agreement, partnership,

or contract between an institution of higher education and any

college, university, or entity that is based in or controlled by a

country of concern or between a public school and any private or

public school that is based in or controlled by a country of

concern;



Req. No. 835 Page 17

2. Data reflecting any office, campus, or physical location

used or maintained by an institution of higher education in a

country of concern; and

3. The date on which any such grant program, agreement,

partnership, or contract reported pursuant to paragraph 1 of this

subsection is expected to terminate.

E. 1. No students’ or scholars’ association affiliated with

any public school or institution of higher education may accept any

gift or grant from a foreign source in a country of concern or enter

into any contract or agreement with a foreign source in a country of

concern. For the purposes of this subsection, member dues or fees

shall not be considered a gift or grant from a foreign source in a

country of concern.

2. A violation of the provisions of paragraph 1 of this

subsection shall result in the public school or institution of

higher education ending any affiliation with the students’ or

scholars’ association.

F. Each public school or institution of higher education that

has established or will establish an exchange program or

international cultural agreement concerning the Mandarin dialect of

the Chinese language or culture shall adopt a policy of prioritizing

partnerships with foreign sources from the Republic of China over

partnerships with foreign sources from the People’s Republic of

China.

Req. No. 835 Page 18

G. The State Board of Education and the State Regents may adopt

regulations and rules to implement the provisions of this section.

SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-168 of Title 70, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. Each institution of higher education or affiliate thereof

that has a research budget of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00)

or more shall screen:

1. Applicants seeking employment in research or research-

related support positions;

2. Graduate and undergraduate students applying for research or

research-related support positions; and

3. Applicants for positions of visiting researcher who are:

a. citizens of a foreign country and who are not

permanent residents of the United States, or

b. citizens and permanent residents of the United States

who have any affiliation with an institution or

program or at least one year of prior employment or

training in a country of concern, with the exception

of employment or training by an agency of the United

States government.

Screening required by this subsection shall be required prior to

interviewing such applicants or offering an applicant a position of



Req. No. 835 Page 19

empl oyment or of visiting researcher. An institution of higher

education may screen other applicants for such positions.

B. In addition to satisfying all employment and enrollment

qualifications imposed by federal law, the governing board of

regents for each institution of higher education shall:

1. Require a foreign applicant to submit a complete copy of his

or her passport and most recently submitted Online Nonimmigrant Visa

Application, DS-160. After extraction and submission of all

information relevant to the requirements of this section, an

institution of higher education may destroy or return the copy of

the DS-160;

2. Require all individuals described in subsection A of this

section to submit:

a. a complete resume and curriculum vitae including every

institution of higher education attended,

b. all previous employment since the applicant reached

the age of eighteen,

c. a list of all published material for which the

applicant received credit as an author, a researcher,

or otherwise to which the applicant contributed

significant research, writing, or editorial support,

d. a list of the applicant’s current and pending research

funding from any source including the source of funds,



Req. No. 835 Page 20

the amount, the applicant’s role on the project, and a

brief description of the research, and

e. a full disclosure of non-institution of higher

education professional activities including any

affiliation with an institution of higher education or

program in a country of concern; and

3. An institution of higher education may require individuals

described in subsection A of this section who have been continually

employed or enrolled in an institution of higher education in the

United States for twenty (20) years or more to submit employment

history prior to the most recent twenty (20) years.

C. The president of each institution of higher education or

affiliate thereof shall designate a research integrity office to

review all materials submitted pursuant to subsection B of this

section and take reasonable steps to verify all attendance,

employment, publications, and contributions included in the

submitted materials. Reasonable steps shall include but not be

limited to searching public databases for research publications,

presentations, and public conflict of interest records to identify

any research publication or presentation that may have been omitted

from the materials submitted pursuant to subsection B of this

section; contacting all employers of the most recent ten (10) years

to verify employment; contacting all institutions of higher

education attended to verify enrollment and educational progress;

Req. No. 835 Page 21

sear ching public listings of persons subject to sanctions or

restrictions under federal law; submitting the applicant’s name and

other identifying information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation

or any federal agency reasonably willing to scrutinize such

applicant for national security or counterespionage purposes; and

any other steps deemed appropriate. The institution of higher

education or affiliate thereof may also direct the research

integrity office to approve applicants for hire based on a risk-

based determination considering the nature of the research and

background and ongoing affiliations of the applicant.

D. The provisions of this section shall be completed before an

institution of higher education or an affiliate thereof interviews

or offers a position to an individual described in subsection A of

this section in any research or research-related support position

and before granting such individual any access to research data or

activities or other sensitive data. An individual described in

subsection A of this section may not be employed in any research or

research-related support position if he or she fails to disclose a

substantial educational, employment, or research-related activity,

publication, or presentation at the time of submitting materials

required by subsection B of this section unless an institution of

higher education department head or his or her designee certifies in

writing the substance of the nondisclosure and the reasons for

disregarding such failure to disclose. A copy of such certification

Req. No. 835 Page 22

shal l be kept in the investigative file of the research integrity

office and shall be submitted to the nearest Federal Bureau of

Investigation field office.

E. An institution of higher education’s research integrity

office designated pursuant to subsection C of this section shall

report to the nearest Federal Bureau of Investigation field office,

any law enforcement agency designated by the Governor, and the board

of regents of the institution of higher education or affiliate

thereof the identity of the individual who was rejected for

employment based on the scrutiny required by this section or other

risk-based screening.

F. Each institution of higher education shall adopt a policy of

prioritizing foreign researchers from allied nations and joint

research projects with allied nations in the following order of

prioritization:

1. Members of the Five Eyes Intelligence Oversight and Review

Council;

2. Current signatories of the North Atlantic Treaty;

3. The State of Israel, the Republic of China, the People’s

Republic of Korea, Japan, the Philippines, and the Republic of

India; and

4. All other countries including remaining nations designated

as a Major Non-North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO) Ally by the

United States Department of State and remaining allied countries.

Req. No. 835 Page 23

G. By July 1, 2026, each institution of higher education or

affiliate thereof that has a research budget of Ten Million Dollars

($10,000,000.00) or more shall establish an international travel

approval and monitoring program. The program shall require

preapproval and screening by an institution of higher education’s

research integrity office designated pursuant to subsection C of

this section, in addition to any other travel approval process

requirements applicable to the institution of higher education.

H. 1. Preapproval by an institution of higher education’s

research integrity office shall be based on the applicant’s review

and acknowledgement of guidance published by the employing

institution of higher education or affiliate thereof which relates

to countries of concern, countries under sanction, or other

restrictions or designations imposed by this state or the United

States government including any federal licensing requirements;

customs rules; export controls; restrictions on taking institutional

property including intellectual property abroad; restrictions on

presentations, teaching, and interactions with foreign colleagues;

and other subjects important to the research and academic integrity

of the institution of higher education.

2. Preapproval by an institution of higher education’s research

integrity office shall be based on the binding commitment of the

individual traveler not to violate the institution of higher



Req. No. 835 Page 24

educ ation’s limitations on travel and activities abroad and to obey

all applicable federal laws.

I. The institution of higher education or affiliate thereof

shall maintain records of all foreign travel requests and approvals;

expenses reimbursed by the institution of higher education or

affiliate thereof during such travel including travel, food, and

lodging; and payments and honoraria received during such travel and

activities including for travel, food, and lodging. The institution

of higher education shall retain the records for at least three (3)

years or any longer period of time required by any applicable state

or federal law.

J. The institution of higher education or affiliate thereof

shall provide an annual report of foreign travel to countries of

concerns listing individual travelers, foreign locations visited,

and foreign institutions visited to its board of regents.

K. By July 1, 2026, the State Auditor and Inspector shall

perform an operational audit regarding implementation of the

provisions of this section.

SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-169 of Title 70, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. Subject to the approval of its board of regents, an

institution of higher education shall only enter into a new or renew

an existing academic partnership with an academic or research

Req. No. 835 Page 25

inst itution located in a country of concern if the institution of

higher education maintains sufficient structural safeguards to

protect its intellectual property, the security of this state, and

the national security interests of the United States. A board of

regents shall only approve an institution of higher education’s

partnership if the board, in consultation with the Office of the

Attorney General, determines the partnership meets the following

safeguard requirements:

1. Compliance with all federal requirements including the

requirements of federal research sponsors and federal export control

agencies, regulations regarding international traffic in arms and

export administration, and economic and trade sanctions administered

by the federal Office of Foreign Assets Control of the United States

Department of the Treasury;

2. Annual formal institution-level programs for faculty on

conflicts of interest and conflicts of commitment; and

3. A formalized foreign visitor process and uniform visiting

scholar agreement.

B. The board of regents of an institution of higher education,

in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, shall have

full discretion to reject or terminate any research partnership

between the institution and an academic or research institution

located in a country of concern at any time and for any purpose.



Req. No. 835 Page 26

SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-170 of Title 70, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. No later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of

this act, the Governor shall appoint one qualified person who shall

be responsible for the “Report on Foreign Influence in Higher

Education”. The report shall be electronically submitted to the

Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker

of the House of Representatives and shall be published semi-annually

on a state website.

B. The Report on Foreign Influence in Higher Education:

1. Shall investigate and provide oversight of all attempted

foreign influence operations in higher education in this state; and

2. May include a synthesis of reports from the federal

government and state agencies, new findings and ongoing

investigations, and recommendations for limiting exposure to foreign

influence.

SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-171 of Title 70, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

The provisions of the Research and Education Protection Act of

2025 are severable and if any part or provision shall be held void,

the decision of the court so holding shall not affect or impair any



Req. No. 835 Page 27

of t he remaining parts or provisions of the Research and Education

Protection Act of 2025.

SECTION 11. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

SECTION 12. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-1-835 EB 1/14/2025 3:50:40 PM































Req. No. 835 Page 28